Idaho statutes. Title 52 NUISANCES
Chapter 1
NUISANCES IN GENERAL

Sec.

§ 52-101. Nuisance defined.

Anything which is injurious to health or morals, or is indecent, or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property, or unlawfully obstructs the free passage or use, in the customary manner, of any navigable lake, or river, stream, canal, or basin, or any public park, square, street, or highway, is a nuisance.

§ 52-102. Public nuisance.

A public nuisance is one which affects at the same time an entire community or neighborhood, or any considerable number of persons, although the extent of the annoyance or damage inflicted upon individuals may be unequal.

§ 52-103. Moral nuisances — Definitions.

As used in title 52, Idaho Code, relating to moral nuisances.

which the average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest; and

which depicts or describes patently offensive representations or descriptions of:

ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated; or

masturbation, excretory functions, or lewd exhibition of the genitals or genital area.

film or plate negative;

film or plate positive;

film designed to be projected on a screen for exhibition;

films, glass slides or transparencies, either in negative or positive form, designed for exhibition by projection on a screen.[;]

video tape or any other medium used to electronically reproduce images on a screen.

Any and every place in the state where lewd films are publicly exhibited as a regular course of business, or possessed for the purpose of such exhibition;

Any and every place in the state where a lewd film is publicly and repeatedly exhibited, or possessed for the purpose of such exhibition;

Any and every lewd film which is publicly exhibited, or possessed for such purpose at a place which is a moral nuisance under this section;

Any and every place of business in the state in which lewd publications constitute a principal part of the stock in trade;

Any and every lewd publication possessed at a place which is a moral nuisance under this section; and

Every place which, as a regular course of business, is used for the purposes of lewdness, assignation, or prostitution, and every such place in or upon which acts of lewdness, assignation, or prostitution, are held or occur.

Nothing herein contained is intended to include or proscribe any matter which, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is used, possesses serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.

§ 52-104. Moral nuisances — Types.

The following are declared to be moral nuisances:

§ 52-105. Moral nuisances — Personal property — Knowledge of nuisance.

The following are also declared to be moral nuisances, as personal property used in conducting and maintaining a moral nuisance:

(A) All monies paid as admission price to the exhibition of any lewd film found to be a moral nuisance.

(B) All valuable consideration received for the sale of any lewd publication which is found to be a moral nuisance.

(C) The furniture and movable contents of a place which is a moral nuisance.

From and after service of a copy of the notice of hearing of the application for a preliminary injunction, provided for in section 52-405, Idaho Code, upon the place, or its manager, or acting manager, or person then in charge, all such parties are deemed to have knowledge of the acts, conditions or things which make such place a moral nuisance. Where the circumstantial proof warrants a determination that a person had knowledge of the moral nuisance prior to such service of process, the court shall make such finding.

§ 52-106. Moral nuisances — Building where gambling is carried on.

Any building, place, or the ground itself, wherein or whereon gambling or any game of chance for money, checks, credit or other representatives of value is carried on or takes place, or gambling paraphernalia is kept, or any notice, sign or device advertising or indicating the existence or presence of such gambling or any game of chance is displayed or exposed to view, is declared a moral nuisance and shall be enjoined and abated as provided by law.

§ 52-107. Private nuisance.

Every nuisance not defined by law as a public nuisance or a moral nuisance, is private.

§ 52-108. When not a nuisance.

Nothing which is done or maintained under the express authority of a statute can be deemed a nuisance.

Section Applied.

A ditch or canal constructed and maintained under express authority of statute cannot be deemed a nuisance. MacCammelly v. Pioneer Irrigation Dist., 17 Idaho 415, 105 P. 1076 (1909); Boise City v. Boise City Canal Co., 19 Idaho 717, 115 P. 505 (1911); City of Twin Falls v. Harlan, 27 Idaho 769, 151 P. 1191 (1915).

Cellar-way and doors in sidewalk maintained by authority of law cannot be deemed a nuisance. Lewiston v. Isaman, 19 Idaho 653, 115 P. 494 (1911).

Running of licensed saloon in regular and lawful manner was not a nuisance (decided when local option law was in effect). Village of Am. Falls v. West, 26 Idaho 301, 142 P. 42 (1914).

§ 52-109. Liability of successive owners for continuing nuisance.

Every successive owner of property who neglects to abate a continuing nuisance upon, or in the use of such property, created by a former owner, is liable therefor in the same manner as the one who first created it.

§ 52-110. Abatement does not preclude action.

The abatement of a nuisance does not prejudice the right of any person to recover damages for its past existence.

§ 52-111. Actions for nuisance.

Anything which is injurious to health or morals, or indecent, or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property, is a nuisance and the subject of an action. In the case of a moral nuisance, the action may be brought by any resident citizen of the county; in all other cases the action may be brought by any person whose property is injuriously affected, or whose personal enjoyment is lessened by the nuisance; and by the judgment the nuisance may be enjoined or abated, as well as damages recovered.